South Dakota, session 2026, SB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 23A-35-14 be AMENDED:
23A-35-14. This chapter does not modify any inconsistent provision of this code
regulating search, seizure, and the issuance and execution of search warrants in
circumstances for which special provision is made.
For purposes of this chapter, "property" includes documents, books, papers, digital
currency, and any other tangible objects.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 23A-35:
For purposes of this chapter, "digital currency" means a digital representation of
value recorded on a cryptographically secured distributed ledger or other medium of
exchange, including blockchain, or similar technology.

26.457.14 2 43
An Act to address search and seizure provisions applicable to digital currency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 43
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 43 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB43 ENROLLED